Massachusetts, session 194th, S1980.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5I of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out, in line 14, the word “one” and inserting in place thereof the
following word:- two.
of 1